Utah statutes.
77-16a-306.   Continuing review -- Discharge.
(1)  Each entity that provides treatment for a defendant committed to the
department as not guilty by reason of insanity under this part shall review
the status of each defendant at least once every six months.  If the treatment
provider finds that a defendant has recovered from his mental illness, or if
still mentally ill, no longer presents a substantial danger to himself or
others, it shall notify the executive director of its findings.
(2)  Upon receipt of notification under Subsection (1), the executive director
shall designate a review team, in accordance with Section 77-16a-304, to
evaluate the defendant.  If that review team concurs with the treatment
provider's assessment, the executive director shall notify the court, the
defendant's attorney, and the prosecuting attorney that the defendant is a
candidate for discharge.  The court shall conduct a hearing, in accordance
with Section 77-16a-302, within 10 business days after receipt of that notice.
(3)  The court may not discharge an individual whose mental illness is in
remission as a result of medication or hospitalization if it can be determined
within reasonable medical probability that without continued medication or
hospitalization the defendant's mental illness will reoccur, making the
defendant a substantial danger to himself or others.
